Maine, session 132, LD1045.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 261, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Costs related to the construction, alteration or expansion of any facilities not
located within the district that are required due to improvements or activities within
the district, including, but not limited to, sewage treatment plants, water treatment
plants or other environmental protection devices; storm or sanitary sewer lines;
water lines; electrical lines; improvements to public safety facilities; and amenities
on streets;
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 261, §5, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (1-A) to read:
(1-A) Costs related to the construction, expansion, alteration or operation of and
improvements to public safety facilities not located within the district that are
required due to improvements or activities within the district;
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 261, §5, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Costs of public safety improvements related to the establishment and operation
of the district or commercial activities in the district. These costs include costs
related to public safety personnel and costs related to the construction, expansion
or operation of and improvements to public safety facilities and public safety
equipment;
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §5225, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 142, §§1 to
3, is further amended by amending subparagraph (9) to read:
(9) Costs related to the construction, expansion, renovation or operation of
municipal or plantation public safety facilities, the need for which is related to
general economic development within the municipality or plantation, not to exceed
15% 50% of the captured assessed value of the development district;